Hawaii statutes.
§46-32 Employees of council. Any other
provision to the contrary notwithstanding, the council of any county may
appoint and employ personnel as it deems necessary and prescribe their powers,
duties and compensation. All such personnel shall be exempt from the civil
service and the position classification plan. Nothing in this section shall be
deemed to affect the civil service or exempt status, salary range, vacation,
sick leave, service credit and other rights and privileges of any incumbent as
it existed on the day prior to May 9, 1977; provided that subsequent
changes may be made pursuant to applicable personnel laws. [L 1969, c 78, §1;
am L 1977, c 62, §1]

Revision Note

"May 9, 1977" substituted for "the
effective date of this section".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next